Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2477
Powers and duties of successor personal representative.

A successor personal representative has the same power and duty as the original personal representative to complete the administration and distribution of the estate, as expeditiously as possible, but he shall not exercise any power expressly made personal to the executor named in the will.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 155, UPC § 3-716.